District of Columbia statutes.
3-101.01

Criminal Code reform.

(a)

Beginning January 1, 2007, the Commission shall also have as its purpose the preparation of comprehensive recommendations to the Council and the Mayor that:

(1)

Revise the language of criminal statutes to be clear and consistent;

(2)

In consultation with the Codification Counsel in the Office of the General Counsel for the Council of the District of Columbia, organize existing criminal statutes in a logical order;

(3)

Assess whether criminal penalties (including fines) for felonies are proportionate to the seriousness of the offense, and, as necessary, revise the penalties so they are proportionate;

(4)

Propose a rational system for classifying misdemeanor criminal statutes, determine appropriate levels of penalties for such classes; and classify misdemeanor criminal statutes in the appropriate classes;

(5)

Identify any crimes defined in common law that should be codified, and propose recommended language for codification, as appropriate;

(6)

Identify criminal statutes that have been held to be unconstitutional;

(7)

Propose such other amendments as the Commission believes are necessary; and

(8)

Enable the adoption of Title 22 as an enacted title of the District of Columbia Official Code.

(b)

No later than March 31, 2007, the Commission shall submit to the Council and the Mayor a work plan and schedule for carrying out the responsibilities authorized by this section. The work of the Commission under this section shall be completed no later than September 30, 2016.

(c)

The Commission shall submit its recommendations for criminal code revisions in the form of reports. Each report shall be accompanied by draft legislation or other specific steps for implementing the recommendations for criminal code revisions.

Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-167, § 2a
as added June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-126, § 2(b), 53 DCR 4709
Oct. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-25, § 2(b), 54 DCR 8014
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 202, 56 DCR 7413
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3032, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 3032(b), 59 DCR 8025
This section is referenced in § 3-101.
D.C. Law 17-25, in subsec. (c), substituted “recommendations for criminal code revisions” for “recommendations”.
D.C. Law 18-88, in subsec. (b), substituted “2012” for “2010”.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (b), substituted “2014” for “2012”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “September 30, 2016” for “September 30, 2014” in the second sentence of (b).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Sentencing and Criminal Code Revision Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-72, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7401).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 202 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 202 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
Short title: Section 3031 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle D of title III of the act may be cited as “Criminal Code Reform Extension Amendment Act of 2011”.
Applicability: Section 4 of D.C. Law 16-126 provided: ’This act shall apply as of January 1, 2007.”